de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Wingsurfen > Zubehör für Wingsurfen > Schutzausrüstung für Wingsurfen: Prallschutz- & Schwimmwesten für Wingfoiling; Wingfoil-Helme
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil Accessories > Wingfoiling Protective Gear: Wingfoil Impact & Buoyancy Vests; Wingfoiling Helmets
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Wingfoiling > Acessórios de Wingfoil > Equipamentos de proteção para wingfoil: Coletes de impacto e flutuação para wingfoil; Capacetes para wingfoil
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Wingfoiling > Akcesoria do wingfoila > Stroje ochronne do wingfoilingu: Kamizelki uderzeniowe i ratunkowe do wingfoila; Kaski do wingfoila
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윙포일링 > 윙포일 액세서리 > 윙포일 보호 장비: 윙포일 임팩트 및 부력 조끼; 윙포일 헬멧
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Wingfoiling > Accesorii pentru wingfoil > Echipamente de protecție pentru wingfoiling: Veste de impact și plutire pentru wingfoil; Căști pentru wingfoiling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Wingfoil > Accessoires pour wingfoil > Équipement de protection pour le wingfoil: Gilets d’impact et de flottaison de wingfoil; Casques de wingfoil
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván cánh > Phụ kiện lướt ván cánh > Đồ bảo hộ môn lướt ván cánh: Áo phao và áo chống va đập wingfoil; Mũ bảo hiểm wingfoil
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Aitvaravimas > Aitvaravimo priedai > Aitvaravimo apsauginės priemonės: Wingfoil smūgiams atsparios ir plūdrumo liemenės; Aitvaravimo šalmai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Wingfoil > Wingfoil Aksesuarları > Wingfoil Koruyucu Donanımı: Wingfoil darbe ve can yelekleri; Wingfoil kaskları
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-utstyr > Wingfoiling – beskyttelsesutstyr: Støt- og flytevester til wingfoil; Hjelmer til wingfoil
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウイングフォイル > ウィングフォイルアクセサリー > ウィングフォイル用プロテクター: ウィングフォイル用インパクト・浮力ベスト; ウィングフォイル用ヘルメット
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-tillbehör > Skyddsutrustning för wingfoiling: Slag- och flytvästar för wingfoil; Hjälmar för wingfoil
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Wingfoilen > Wingfoilaccessoires > Wingfoilbeschermingsuitrusting: Wingfoil-impact- en drijfvesten; Wingfoil-helmen
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Wingfoil > Accessori per wingfoil > Attrezzatura protettiva per wingfoil: Giubbotti antiurto e salvagente per wingfoil; Caschi da wingfoil
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Аксесоари за уингфойл > Защитна екипировка за уингфойл: Ударни жилетки за водни спортове; Каски за уиндфойл
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Wingfoiling > Αξεσουάρ Wingfoil > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός Wingfoiling: Γιλέκα κρούσης και άνωσης wingfoil; Κράνη wingfoil
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风翼冲浪 > 风翼冲浪配件 > 风翼冲浪防护装备: 风翼防撞与浮力背心; 风翼头盔
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Foilpurjelautailu > Foilpurjelautailuvarusteet > Foilpurjelautailun suojavarusteet: Wingfoil-isku- ja kelluntaliivit; Wingfoil-kypärät
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼配件 > 水翼風翼護具: 風翼水翼防撞與浮力背心; 風翼水翼安全帽
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szárnyszörfözés > Szárnyszörfözési kiegészítők > Szárnyszörfözési védőfelszerelés: Wingfoil ütésvédő és úszómellények; Wingfoil sisakok
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Wingfoiling > Príslušenstvo k wingfoilingu > Ochranné vybavenie k wingfoilingu: Nárazové a plávacie vesty pre wingfoil; Prilby na wingfoiling
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil – doplňky > Wingfoiling – ochranné pomůcky: Nárazové a vztlakové vesty pro wingfoiling; Helmy na wingfoiling
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Вингфойлинг > Аксессуары для вингфойлинга > Защитная экипировка для вингфойлинга: Противоударные и спасательные жилеты для вингфойлинга; Шлемы для вингфойлинга
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Wingfoiling > Accesorios para wingfoil > Equipo de protección para el wingfoiling: Chalecos de impacto y flotabilidad para wingfoil; Cascos para wingfoil
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Wingfoil > Acessórios de wingfoil > Equipamento de proteção para wingfoil: Coletes de impacto e flutuação para wingfoil; Capacetes para wingfoil
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Foilanje > Dodatki za foilanje > Zaščitna oprema za foilanje: Zaščitni in plovni jopiči za hidrokrilno wingsurfanje; Čelade za foilanje s krilom
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Wingsurfing > Tilbehør til wingsurfing > Beskyttelsesudstyr til wingsurfing: Impact- og svømmeveste til wingfoil; Hjelme til wingfoil
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Wingfoiling > Dodaci za wingfoiling > Zaštitna oprema za wingfoiling: Prsluci za zaštitu od udara i plutanje za wingfoiling; Kacige za wingfoiling
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วิงฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์เสริมวิงฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันวิงฟอยล์: เสื้อกันกระแทกและเสื้อชูชีพวิงฟอยล์; หมวกกันน็อควิงฟอยล์